Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-27,187.01
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Nebraska Advantage Rural Development Act, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) Any term has the same meaning as used in the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967;

(2) Equivalent employees means the number of employees computed by dividing the total hours paid in a year to employees by the product of forty times the number of weeks in a year;

(3) Livestock means all animals, including cattle, horses, sheep, goats, hogs, dairy animals, chickens, turkeys, and other species of game birds and animals raised and produced subject to permit and regulation by the Game and Parks Commission or the Department of Agriculture;

(4) Livestock modernization or expansion means the construction, improvement, or acquisition of buildings, facilities, or equipment for livestock housing, confinement, feeding, production, and waste management. Livestock modernization or expansion does not include any improvements made to correct a violation of the Environmental Protection Act, the Integrated Solid Waste Management Act, the Livestock Waste Management Act, a rule or regulation adopted and promulgated pursuant to such acts, or any order of the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment undertaken within five years after a complaint issued from the Director of Water, Energy, and Environment under section 81-1507;

(5) Livestock production means the active use, management, and operation of real and personal property (a) for the commercial production of livestock, (b) for the commercial breeding, training, showing, or racing of horses or for the use of horses in a recreational or tourism enterprise, and (c) for the commercial production of dairy and eggs. The activity will be considered commercial if the gross income derived from an activity for two or more of the taxable years in the period of seven consecutive taxable years which ends with the taxable year exceeds the deductions attributable to such activity or, if the operation has been in existence for less than seven years, if the activity is engaged in for the purpose of generating a profit;

(6) Qualified employee leasing company means a company which places all employees of a client-lessee on its payroll and leases such employees to the client-lessee on an ongoing basis for a fee and, by written agreement between the employee leasing company and a client-lessee, grants to the client-lessee input into the hiring and firing of the employees leased to the client-lessee;

(7) Related taxpayers includes any corporations that are part of a unitary business under the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 but are not part of the same corporate taxpayer, any business entities that are not corporations but which would be a part of the unitary business if they were corporations, and any business entities if at least fifty percent of such entities are owned by the same persons or related taxpayers and family members as defined in the ownership attribution rules of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended;

(8) Taxpayer means a corporate taxpayer or other person subject to either an income tax imposed by the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 or a franchise tax under Chapter 77, article 38, or a partnership, limited liability company, subchapter S corporation, cooperative, including a cooperative exempt under section 521 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, limited cooperative association, or joint venture that is or would otherwise be a member of the same unitary group if incorporated, which is, or whose partners, members, or owners representing an ownership interest of at least ninety percent of the control of such entity are, subject to or exempt from such taxes, and any other partnership, limited liability company, subchapter S corporation, cooperative, including a cooperative exempt under section 521 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, limited cooperative association, or joint venture when the partners, members, or owners representing an ownership interest of at least ninety percent of the control of such entity are subject to or exempt from such taxes; and

(9) Year means the taxable year of the taxpayer.

Laws 1997, LB 886, § 2;

Laws 1998, LB 1104, § 15;

Laws 1999, LB 539, § 1;

Laws 2003, LB 608, § 2;

Laws 2005, LB 312, § 17;

Laws 2006, LB 990, § 2;

Laws 2006, LB 1003, § 8;

Laws 2007, LB223, § 16;

Laws 2007, LB368, § 136;

Laws 2008, LB895, § 2;

Laws 2015, LB175, § 6;

Laws 2019, LB302, § 101;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 394.

Environmental Protection Act, see section 81-1532.

Integrated Solid Waste Management Act, see section 13-2001.

Livestock Waste Management Act, see section 54-2416.

Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967, see section 77-2701.